Tennessee, session 114, HB1675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-306, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(j)
(1) An LEA shall classify school nurses employed by the LEA as licensed
personnel for purposes of this section and shall compensate school nurses
according to the salary schedule adopted by the LEA for licensed personnel for
the respective school year. This subsection (j) does not limit or restrict an LEA's
ability to contract with the Tennessee public school nurse program, created by §
68-1-1201, for the provision of school health services, or to set the terms of such
a contract, including the compensation for a school nurse. This subsection (j)
does not apply to compensation paid to contractors of the LEA.
(2)
(A) School nurses must receive the same base salary, for the
respective school year, as that established for licensed teachers with a
bachelor's degree and zero (0) years of experience, if the school nurse:
(i) Is an employee of the LEA;
(ii) Holds a valid license to practice professional nursing
as a registered nurse;
(iii) Is credentialed as a Nationally Certified School Nurse
by the National Board for Certification of School Nurses; and
HB1675
010213
- 1 -

(iv) Has zero (0) years of experience.
(B) School nurses employed by the LEA who have more training
and experience than the training and experience identified in subdivision
(j)(2)(A) must receive more than the base salary per school year.
(C) School nurses employed by the LEA who have less training
and experience than the training and experience identified in subdivision
(j)(2)(A) must receive less than the base salary per school year.
(3) A salary schedule adopted pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) shall not
result in the reduction of the salary of a school nurse employed by the LEA at the
time of the adoption of the salary schedule.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 010213